Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB487.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 262.095 is amended to read as follows:
Appropriations out of the State Treasury to finance the program of the Soil and Water
Conservation Commission shall be paid out directly on the orders of the
chairperson[chairman], and shall be used to pay the expenses of the commission.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/10/2025 10:46 AM Jacketed